Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1 General Provisions
43-38-120. Filing of annual reports — Required information — Currency of report — Time of filing.

Each domestic cooperative shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an annual report that sets forth:

The name of the cooperative and the jurisdiction under whose law it is incorporated;

The street address and zip code of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at that office in this state;

The street address, including the zip code, of its principal executive office;

The names and business addresses, including the zip code, of its board;

The names and business addresses, including the zip code, of its managers or equivalent;

The federal employer identification number (FEIN) of the cooperative, or if such number has not been obtained, a representation that it has been applied for; and

The number of members of the cooperative at the date of filing.

Information in the annual report shall be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the cooperative.

Every cooperative shall file the annual report with the secretary of state on or before the first day of the fourth month following the end of the close of the cooperative's fiscal year.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 23.

43-38-121. Indemnification.

Subject to such standards and restrictions, if any, as are set forth in its articles or bylaws, a cooperative may, and shall have the power to, indemnify and hold harmless any member or officer or other person from and against any and all claims and demands whatsoever.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 30.

43-38-122. Merger and consolidation.

Unless otherwise prohibited, cooperatives organized under the laws of this state may merge or consolidate with each other or other business entities organized under the laws of this state or another state by complying with this section or the law of the state where the surviving or new business entity will exist.

To initiate a merger or consolidation of a cooperative, a written plan of merger or consolidation shall be prepared by the board or by a committee selected by the board to prepare a plan. The plan shall state:

The names of the constituent cooperatives and other business entities;

The name of the surviving or new cooperative or other business entity;

The manner and basis of converting membership or ownership interests of the constituent cooperatives or business entities into membership or ownership interests in the surviving or new cooperative or business entity;

The terms of the merger or consolidation;

The proposed effect of the consolidation or merger on the members and patron members of the cooperative;

For a consolidation, the plan shall contain the articles of the entity or organizational documents to be filed with the state in which the entity is organized; and

Any other provisions required by the laws under which any party to the merger is organized.

The following shall apply to notice:

The board shall mail a merger or consolidation or otherwise transmit or deliver notice to each member. The notice shall contain:

The full text of the plan; and

The time and place of the meeting at which the plan will be considered; and

A cooperative with more than two hundred (200) members may provide the merger or consolidation notice in the same manner as a regular members' meeting notice.

The following shall apply to the adoption of a plan of merger or consolidation:

A plan of merger or consolidation is adopted if:

The directors recommend the plan of merger or consolidation be approved by the members, unless the directors determine that, because of conflict of interest or due to the special circumstances, it should make no recommendation, in which case the directors shall submit the plan of merger or consolidation to the members of the cooperative for approval without recommendation and, in connection with the submission, shall communicate the basis for its determination that the plan be submitted for approval without any recommendation;

A quorum of the members is registered as being present or represented by mail vote at the meeting; and

The plan is approved by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast, or for a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring more than two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast or other conditions for approval, the plan is approved by a proportion of the votes cast or a number of total members as required by the articles or bylaws and the conditions for approval in the articles or bylaws have been satisfied;

After the plan has been adopted, articles of merger or consolidation stating the plan and that the plan was adopted according to this chapter shall be signed by the chair, vice-chair, records officer or documents officer of each cooperative merging or consolidating;

The articles of merger or consolidation shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and must set forth:

The name, jurisdiction and date of formation or organization of each of the cooperatives or other entities that are a party to the merger;

That a plan of merger has been approved and executed by each of the cooperatives and other business entities that are a party to the merger;

The name and address of the principal executive office or equivalent thereof, of the surviving or resulting entity into which the other entities will merge;

The future effective date or time, which shall be a date or time certain and which shall comply with § 43-38-1109(b) of the merger, if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the plan of merger;

That the plan of merger is on file at a place of business of the surviving or resulting entity, and shall state the address thereof;

That a copy of the plan of merger will be furnished by the surviving or resulting entity, on request and without cost, to any member of any domestic cooperative or any persons holding an interest in any other entity that is or was a party to the merger; and

If the surviving or resulting entity is not a domestic cooperative, a statement that such surviving or resulting entity agrees that it may be served with process in this state in any action, suit or proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any entity that is a party to the merger, irrevocably appointing the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any such action, suit or proceeding and specifying the address to which a copy of the process shall be mailed to it by the secretary of state. In the event of service hereunder upon the secretary of state, the procedures set forth in § 43-38-111 shall be applicable, except that the plaintiff in any such action, suit or proceeding shall furnish the secretary of state with the address specified in the certificate of merger provided for in this section and any other address that the plaintiff may elect to furnish, together with copies of such process as required by the secretary of state, and the secretary of state shall notify such surviving or resulting other business entity at all addresses furnished by the plaintiff in accordance with the procedures set forth in § 43-38-111;

For a merger, the articles of the surviving cooperative subject to this chapter are deemed amended to the extent provided in the articles of merger; and

Unless a later date is provided in the plan, the merger or consolidation is effective when the articles of merger or consolidation are filed in the office of the secretary of state.

The following shall apply to the effect of a merger:

After the effective date, the cooperatives or other business entities that are parties to the plan become a single entity. For a merger, the surviving business entity is the business entity designated in the plan. For a consolidation, the new cooperative or other business entity is the business entity provided for in the plan. Except for the surviving or new business entity, the separate existence of all business entities that are parties to the plan cease on the effective date of the merger or consolidation. The articles of merger as filed with the office of the secretary of state shall act as notice of dissolution and articles of termination for a domestic cooperative that is not the surviving or resulting entity in the merger;

The surviving or new business entity possesses all of the rights and property of each of the merged or consolidated business entities and is responsible for and assumes all their obligations and duties. The title to property of the merged or consolidated business entity is vested in the surviving or new business entity without reversion or impairment of title caused by the merger or consolidation. All liens upon any property of any of the merged business entities shall be preserved unimpaired and may be enforced against the surviving or resulting entity to the same extent as if the debts, liabilities and duties had been incurred or contracted by the surviving or resulting party; and

The right of a creditor may not be impaired by the merger or consolidation without the creditor's consent.

The fee to be paid to the secretary of state for filing articles of merger or consolidation shall conform with § 43-38-1103.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 31.

43-38-123. Management of property and assets.

A cooperative may, by affirmative vote of a majority of the board present, upon those terms and conditions and for those considerations, which may be money, securities, or other instruments for the payment of money or other property, as the board of directors considers expedient, and without member approval:

Sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its property and assets in the usual and regular course of its business;

Grant a security interest in all or substantially all of its property and assets whether or not in the usual and regular course of its business; or

Transfer any or all of its property to a business entity all the ownership interests of which are owned by the cooperative.

Unless the articles require it, approval by the members of a transaction described in subdivision (a)(1) is not required.

A cooperative, by affirmative vote of a majority of the board of directors present, may sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its property and assets, including its good will, not in the usual and regular course of its business, upon those terms and conditions and for those considerations, which may be money, securities, or other instruments for the payment of money or other property, as the board of directors considers expedient, when approved at a regular or special meeting of the members by the affirmative vote of the owners of a majority of the voting power of the interests entitled to vote. Written notice of the meeting must be given to all members whether or not they are entitled to vote at the meeting. The written notice must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the cooperative.

Confirmatory deeds, assignments, or similar instruments to evidence a sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition may be signed and delivered at any time in the name of the transferor by its current chair of the board of directors or authorized agents.

The transferee is liable for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the transferor only to the extent provided in the contract or agreement between the transferee and the transferor or to the extent provided by the statutes of this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 31.

43-38-124. Promulgation of rules and regulations — Destruction of records.

The secretary of state has the authority and is empowered to perform the duties required of the secretary of state by this chapter including, without limitation, the authority to promulgate necessary and appropriate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and the power to destroy any records in the secretary of state's office concerning a cooperative ten (10) years after such cooperative has dissolved, withdrawn from the state or has had its certificate of authority revoked.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33.

43-38-125. Deputies of the secretary of state.

An act of a duly authorized deputy of the secretary of state in the secretary of state's behalf under this chapter is the equivalent of the act of the secretary of state; provided, however, that the deputy signs the name of the secretary of state by the deputy as deputy.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 33.